California statutes. Public Resources Code
(B) The person’s ability to reserve a site using the online reservation system may resume within one calendar year from the date of the reservationholder’s third failure to show up for a reservation.

(C) This paragraph shall not apply to reservations and occupation of sites obtained using walkup reservations or first-come-first-served systems.

(c) A reservationholder who cancels a reservation seven calendar days or more before the reservation start date shall receive a refund of the cost of the reservation, excluding any reservation fees.

(d) A reservationholder who cancels a reservation within two to six calendar days before the reservation start date may forfeit the cost of the reservation for the first night plus any reservation fees.

(e) A reservationholder who cancels a reservation or fails to show up within 24 hours of the reservation start date may forfeit the entire cost of the reservation plus any reservation fees.

(f) A reservationholder may either show up or provide notice of late arrival to staff at the state park unit where the reservation is held within 24 hours of the reservation start date in order to avoid forfeiting the entire cost of the reservation.

(g) A camp or lodging site for which the reservationholder cancels a reservation three calendar days or more before the reservation start date may be made available for
 reservation through the online reservation system.

(h) A reservationholder shall receive at least two reminders via email or another form of communication, as follows:

(1) Ten days before the reservation start date, that informs the reservationholder of cancellation at least seven days before the reservation start date to receive a refund of the cost of the reservation, excluding any reservation fees.

(2) Four days before the reservation start date, informing the reservationholder of cancellation within three calendar days of the reservation start date to avoid the forfeiture of one night of reservation costs plus any reservation fees.

(i) As part of the communication described in subdivision (h), a reservationholder shall be informed that the entire
 cost of the reservation plus any reservation fees may be forfeited if the reservationholder does either of the following:

(1) Cancels within 24 hours of the reservation start date.

(2) Fails to either show up or notify staff at the state park unit where the reservation is held of a late arrival no later than 24 hours following the reservation start date.

(j) Forfeited reservation costs, as described in subdivisions (d) and (e), shall be deposited into the State Parks and Recreation Fund, established pursuant to Section 5010, and may be used, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for purposes of deferred maintenance projects.

(k) This section shall only apply to a camp or lodging site that uses the reservation system described in subdivision (b) of
 Section 5010.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 536, Sec. 1.   (AB 618)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5010.1.6.

(a) On or before January 1, 2025, the department shall implement a reservation drawing for up to five of the most popular units of the state park system. The department shall determine the top units for purposes of this section based on units that have the most booking interest six months before the reservation date.

(b) At any unit of the state park system described in subdivision (a), the department may continue to use the reservation system authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 5010.1 and as described in Section 5010.1.5 for a subset of camping or lodging sites within the state park unit for purposes of providing an analysis between the reservation drawing process established by this section and existing reservation system
 processes.

(c) (1) On or before January 1, 2028, the department shall provide a report to the Legislature on the outcomes of the reservation drawing established pursuant to subdivision (a), including, if pursued by the department, any analysis obtained pursuant to subdivision (b). 

(2) A report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 536, Sec. 2.   (AB 618)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5010.2.

The department shall not collect from any group of pupils in kindergarten or grades 1 to 12, inclusive, or their escorts, including, but not limited to, teachers, other supervisory personnel, and busdrivers, any fee, rental or other return for the use of any unit in the state park system, except Hearst San Simeon State Historic Monument, which would otherwise be collectible pursuant to Section 5010, when the group is visiting the area pursuant to a school outing or field trip under the direction of school personnel and has made prior arrangements with the department either through reservation or contact with the department’s historical unit manager.

This section shall apply to both public and private schools located in the state.

It is the intent of the Legislature that this section applies to the day use of units in the state park system unless the Director of Parks and Recreation authorizes overnight camping by those groups designated in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1206.)
-------------------------------------------

5010.2.5.

(a) The department may establish the California State Park Adventure Pass. The pass shall be available, upon application to the department, to any child in grade 4, or grade 4 equivalent, who is a California resident and enrolled in a California public school.

(b) (1) The department may waive the day use entrance fees to an eligible unit of the state park system, as determined by the department, for any child who holds a valid California State Park Adventure Pass as described in subdivision (a).

(2) The entrance fee waiver pursuant to paragraph (1) shall cover, where applicable, both of the following:

(A) A per vehicle entrance fee, including all passengers in the vehicle, as long as the vehicle is a single, private, noncommercial vehicle that is used to transport the grade 4 child to the unit of the state park system.

(B) A per person entrance fee, including up to three adults, 16 years of age or older, and all children, 15 years of age and younger, accompanying the grade 4 child.

(c) The department shall post on its internet website the list of state parks eligible for the waiver, pursuant to subdivision (b), and information on how to obtain the California State Park Adventure Pass, including a hyperlink.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 38.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5010.3.

The department may waive all fees for the use, including camping where permitted, of any unit of the state park system by students of the California Cadet Corps or of a public military academy, pursuant to Section 5080.44, in exchange for completing a community service project at the unit that has been approved in advance by state park officials and appropriate staff of the California Cadet Corps or the
 academy, as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 212, Sec. 1.   (AB 1355)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5010.4.

(a) The department may license, sell, or license and sell, its branded merchandise, images, and other state-park-related merchandise, directly to the public for revenue generation, if the department is unable to obtain through good faith efforts a concession or cooperating association agreement to provide these services.

(b) (1) The department may enter into agreements with individuals, public agencies, qualified nonprofit organizations, and other private entities for sale of department branded merchandise, images, or other state-park-related merchandise to the public.

(2) The department shall receive fair and reasonable revenues and commissions for the sales and agreements to
 sell merchandise.

(c) (1) All revenues and commissions received by the department as a result of this section shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Parks and Recreation Fund, pursuant to Section 5010.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), all revenues and commissions received by the department from the state vehicular recreation areas as a result of this section shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the Off-Highway Vehicle Trust Fund, pursuant to Section 38225 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 222.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5010.5.

The director may authorize the refund of moneys received or collected by himself or by the department illegally, or by mistake, inadvertence, or error. Claims authorized by the director shall be filed with the State Controller and the Controller shall draw his warrant against the General Fund in payment of such refund from any appropriation made for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

5010.6.

(a) For purposes of this section, “subaccount” means the State Parks Revenue Incentive Subaccount created pursuant to this section.

(b) The State Parks Revenue Incentive Subaccount is hereby created within the State Parks and Recreation Fund.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the funds in the subaccount are hereby continuously appropriated to the department for activities, programs, and projects, including, but not limited to, capital outlay projects, that are consistent with the mission of the department and that increase the department’s capacity to generate revenue and to implement the revenue generation program developed pursuant to Section 5010.7. Expenditures from the
 subaccount may include expenditures for staffing entry points, including department employees, seasonal employees, state and local conservation corps, individuals qualified pursuant to Chapter 0908 of the Department Operations Manual, and employees of organizations with agreements with state parks pursuant to Sections 513, 5009.1, 5009.3, and 5080. Activities, programs, and projects funded by the subaccount shall each include all of the following:

(1) A clear description of the proposed use of funds.

(2) A timeframe for implementation of the activity, program, or project.

(3) A projection of revenues, including annual income, fees, and projected usage rates.

(4) A projection of costs, including, if appropriate, design, planning, construction, operation,
 staff, maintenance, marketing, and information technology.

(5) A market analysis demonstrating demand for the activity, project, or program.

(6) A projected rate of return on the investment.

(d) The Office of State Audits and Evaluations shall review the activities, programs, and projects funded from the subaccount pursuant to subdivision (c) to ensure appropriate internal controls are in place. The department shall reimburse the Office of State Audits and Evaluations from the subaccount for any costs related to the review.

(e) The revenue generated from activities, programs, and projects funded by the subaccount are continuously appropriated for expenditure by the department pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section
 5010.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 20.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5010.7.

(a) The department shall develop a revenue generation program as an essential component of a long-term sustainable park funding strategy. On or before July 1, 2014, and annually thereafter, the department shall assign a revenue generation target to each district under the control of the department. The department shall develop guidelines for districts to report the use of funds generated by the revenue generation program, and shall post information and copies of the reports on its Internet Web site.

(b) The California State Park Enterprise Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury as a working capital fund, and the revenue shall be available to the department upon appropriation by the Legislature for capital outlay or support expenditures for revenue generating
 investments in state parks. These investments may include, but are not limited to, planning and implementation of a statewide electronic fee collection system that includes installation of modern fee collection equipment and technologies to enhance collection of state park users fees and that will enable park users to pay fees with commonly used forms of electronic fund transfers, including, but not limited to, credit and debit card transactions, and other park revenue generating projects, and shall be available for encumbrance and expenditure until June 30, 2021, and for liquidation until June 30, 2023.

(1) The department shall prepare guidelines for districts to apply for funds for capital projects that are consistent with this subdivision.

(2) The guidelines prepared pursuant to this subdivision shall require all of the following:

(A) A clear description of the proposed use of funds.

(B) A timeframe of implementation of the capital project.

(C) A projection of revenue, including annual income, fees, and projected usage rates.

(D) A projection of costs, including design, planning, construction, operation, staff, maintenance, marketing, and information technology.

(E) A market analysis demonstrating demand for the project.

(F) A projected rate of return on the investment.

(c) The revenue generated by the revenue generation program developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be deposited into the
 State Parks and Recreation Fund. Except as provided in subdivision (h), all or a portion of the revenue identified as being in excess of the district revenue targets may be transferred to the State Parks Revenue Incentive Subaccount, established pursuant to Section 5010.6, as follows:

(1) (A) Up to 50 percent may be transferred to the subaccount and allocated by the department to park districts that exceed their established revenue targets.

(B) Each district shall use the funds it receives pursuant to this section to improve the parks in that district through revenue generation programs and projects and other activities that will assist in the district’s revenue generation activities, and the programs, projects, and other activities shall be consistent with the mission and purpose of each unit and with the plan developed for the unit pursuant to subdivision
 (a) of Section 5002.2.

(C) The department shall report to the Legislature, commencing on July 1, 2014, and annually on or before each December 31 thereafter, on the revenue distributed to each district pursuant to this section.

(2) Up to 50 percent may be transferred to the subaccount and allocated by the department for the following purposes:

(A) To fund the capital costs of construction and installation of new revenue and fee collection equipment and technologies and other physical upgrades to existing state park system lands and facilities.

(B) For costs of restoration, rehabilitation, and improvement of the state park system and its natural, historical, and visitor-serving resources that enhance visitation and are designed to create opportunities to
 increase revenues.

(C) For costs to the department to implement the action plan required to be developed by the department pursuant to Section 5019.92.

(D) Pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 5010.6, for expenditures to support revenue generation projects that include, but are not limited to, staffing kiosks, campgrounds, and parking lots.

(d) The funds generated by the revenue generation program shall not be used by the department to expand the park system, unless there is significant revenue generation potential from such an expansion.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 5009, moneys received by the department from private contributions and other public funding sources may also be deposited into the California State Park Enterprise Fund and the State Parks
 Revenue Incentive Subaccount for use for the purposes of subdivision (c).

(f) The department shall provide all relevant information on its Internet Web site concerning how funds in the State Parks and Recreation Revenue Incentive Subaccount and the California State Park Enterprise Fund are spent.

(g) The department may recoup its costs for implementing and administering the working capital from the fund.

(h) The department shall not transfer funds to the State Parks Revenue Incentive Subaccount pursuant to subdivision (c) if the statewide department revenue target is not met.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 51, Sec. 22.   (SB 854)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5011.

(a) Any person receiving aid to the aged, blind, or disabled under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, any person receiving aid under the federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) program under Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.), any person receiving aid under the California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids Act (CalWORKs program) under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or any person over 62 years of age whose total monthly income from all sources, including any old age assistance payments, does not exceed the amount specified in
 subdivision (c) of Section 12200 of the Welfare and Institutions Code for a single person, or in subdivision (d) of that section for married persons, as adjusted pursuant to Section 12201 of that code, upon application therefor and payment of five dollars ($5) to the Department of Parks and Recreation, shall be issued a “Golden Bear Pass” that is valid for the specified year and that entitles the bearer and spouse to free use on any day of the day-use facilities in units of the state park system, except Hearst San Simeon State Historical Monument, Sutter’s Fort State Historic Park, and the California State Railroad Museum, under limitations as may be determined by departmental regulation regarding peak hours and contractual arrangements with vendors. The pass shall entitle the bearer and spouse to have access only to day-use facilities and not to the use of any other facilities.

(b) The department shall not grant half price privileges or offer any discount for the use of state park system facilities on the basis of the pass authorized by this section.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the department shall develop and implement, on or before January 1, 1986, a senior discount program for the use of state park system facilities. The program may be modified after January 1, 1991, to include a “Golden Bear Senior Pass” available to any person over 62 years of age for an annual fee fixed by the department, valid for the specified year, and entitling the bearer and spouse to the use of day and camping facilities as specified by the department. The department shall set the fee for the “Golden Bear Senior Pass” and shall specify the facilities and times for which
 the pass is valid so as to minimize any loss in total annual park revenues to the department.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), on and after July 1, 2021, the department shall waive the five-dollar ($5) fee to obtain the “Golden Bear Pass” described in subdivision (a).

(2) This subdivision shall become inoperative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 831, Sec. 3.   (AB 1150)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5011.5.

(a) A veteran of a war in which the United States has been, or may be engaged, who is a resident of this state, upon presentation to the department of proof of disability, proof of being held captive as a prisoner of war, or proof of being a recipient of a Congressional Medal of Honor, and proof of an honorable discharge from service, upon application therefor, shall be issued a pass entitling the bearer to the use of all facilities, including boat launching facilities, in units of the state park system.

(b) As used in this section:

(1) “Veteran” means a former member of the Armed Forces of the United States who has a 50 percent or greater service-connected disability, or who was held as a prisoner of war by forces hostile to the United States, as certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, and who was honorably discharged from service.

(2) “War” means that period of time commencing when Congress declares war or when the Armed Forces of the United States are engaged in active military operations against a foreign power, whether or not war has been formally declared, and ending upon the termination of hostilities as proclaimed by the President of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 129, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

5011.6.

The department may offer a reduced fee or free day use of any unit of the state park that is operated by the state and accessible with a vehicle day use annual pass, as those parks are listed on the department’s Internet Web site, to a veteran, as defined in Section 980 of the Military and Veterans Code, or active duty or reserve military personnel for the United States Armed Forces or the National Guard of any state, on Memorial Day and Veterans Day if the veteran can provide proof of
 current military identification, or proof of discharge under conditions other than dishonorable or bad conduct, or the active duty or reserve military personnel of the Armed Forces or the National Guard can provide current military identification.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 688, Sec. 1.   (AB 150)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

5011.7.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the use of conservation easements can assist the department in protecting the natural resources of the state park system and prevent incompatible uses on property at a low cost, while maintaining land in private ownership and productive use.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meaning:

(1) “Conservation easement” means a limitation
 in a recorded instrument that contains an easement, restriction, covenant, condition, or offer to dedicate, that has been executed by or on behalf of the owner of the land subject to that limitation and is binding upon successive owners of the land, and the purpose of which is to retain land predominantly in its natural, scenic, historical, agricultural, forested, or open-space condition. “Conservation easement” includes a conservation easement as defined in Section 815.1 of the Civil Code, an open-space easement as defined in Section 51075 of the Government Code, and an agricultural conservation easement as defined in Section 10211.

(2) “Local government” means a city, county, or district.

(3) “Nonprofit land trust organization” means a nonprofit organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3)), that is exempt from taxation under
 Section 501(a) of that code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(a)), and that has among its purposes the conservation of natural or cultural resources.

(c) The department may acquire a conservation easement on real property, pursuant to the requirements of Section 5006, if the department determines that the conservation easement is necessary to protect a unit of the state park system from an incompatible use or to preserve and enhance the natural resource, cultural, or historic value of the unit of the state park system.

(d) (1) For the purposes of this section, the department may make grants to a state or local government agency or a nonprofit land trust organization to purchase and hold a conservation easement, using funds appropriated to the department through the annual Budget Act that have been authorized for encumbrance for either capital outlay or local
 assistance.

(2) The director shall not disburse grant funds to a state or local government agency or a nonprofit land trust organization to purchase and hold the easement until the grantee agrees that the easement acquired will be used only for the purpose for which the grant was requested.

(3) The director shall find that the disposition of the easement is consistent with, and in furtherance of, the purposes of this division and that the holder of the easement is qualified to monitor and enforce the easement.

(4) If the state or local government agency or nonprofit land trust organization holding the easement is dissolved, the easement shall be transferred to a state or local government agency or nonprofit land trust organization that is qualified to monitor and enforce the easement. The transfer of the easement
 shall go into effect after a subsequently recorded document reflecting that transfer is recorded.

(5) The easement or its terms may be amended with the consent of the property owner and the state or local government agency or nonprofit land trust organization holding the easement and upon approval by the department if the department determines that the amendment is consistent with this section. An amendment to the conservation easement shall go into effect once a subsequently recorded document setting forth the amendment is recorded.

(6) The director shall not disburse any grant funds unless the recipient agrees to restrict the use of the land in perpetuity.

(e) On or before July 1, 2009, the department shall adopt written policies regarding conservation easement purchases. At a minimum, these policies shall include
 procedures to monitor and enforce the provisions of the conservation easement. The policies shall be made available on the department’s Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

5012.

The department may, upon application by the proper authorities, grant permits and easements for the following purposes and upon the terms as the department may prescribe:

(a) To a public agency for public roads.

(b) To a public agency for public bicycle and pedestrian trails.

(c) To a public agency for utility lines.

(d) For electric, gas, water, sewer, telephone, telegraph and utility lines, and pipelines and structures incidental thereto, to perform a public service or oil or gas pipelines.

(e) To a public agency for channels or facilities for the development of small craft harbors and recreational areas.

(f) (1) To an oil and gas lessee of the state for pipeline right-of-way purposes.

(2) A permit, easement, or right-of-way for oil or gas pipelines shall not be granted pursuant to this section as to land acquired by the state for beach or park purposes by condemnation after September 18, 1959, unless and until a period of 12 calendar months has elapsed following the date of acquisition of the land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 469, Sec. 6.   (SB 785)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5012.1.

In any lease, easement, right-of-way, license, or permit entered into whereby the department leases real property, obtains a license, permit, or a grant of easement or right-of-way to enter upon the property, the department may agree to indemnify and hold harmless the grantor, lessor, licensor, or permittor by reason of the uses or entry authorized by such lease, easement, right-of-way, license, or permit, and may agree to pay for any damages caused by such authorized use or entry. Insurance may be purchased by the Department of General Services, upon request of the department, to protect the department against loss or expense arising out of such a lease, license, permit,
 easement or right-of-way.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1277.)
-------------------------------------------

5012.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subsequent to the creation of an easement for a roadway connecting to Mulholland Drive through the Mulholland Scenic Corridor and Topanga State Park or other state-owned parkland, the department may impose conditions and restrictions on the development of the roadway thereon and upon contiguous portions of Mulholland Drive if the director finds that geologic or other circumstances exist which cause or may cause substantial damage to state-owned park resources. 

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, these conditions
 and restrictions, including the imposition of, and compliance with, these conditions and restrictions, shall not constitute a new project or otherwise affect the validity of recorded tract maps or other entitlements, shall supersede, preempt, and replace any conditions, restrictions, or other requirements imposed on, or in connection with those tract maps and other entitlements to the extent inconsistent with these conditions and restrictions, and shall not in any way jeopardize previously approved projects or cause a reopening of a previously completed environmental review process. This subdivision shall not be of any legal effect, for the purpose of superseding and preempting any locally imposed conditions, unless the owner of the property subject to locally imposed conditions shall pay the amount of the estimated cost savings as a result of superseding the locally imposed conditions to the Los Angeles County Transportation Commission for traffic mitigation within the San Fernando Valley Statistical Area,
 as defined in Section 11093 of the Government Code, on or before December 31, 1991.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 875, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5013.

The department may acquire, purchase, and obtain objects of historical interest, and it may purchase sites for and establish and maintain museums for such objects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 94.)
-------------------------------------------

5014.

The Director of Parks and Recreation shall convey to the Hussey Ranch Corporation, upon such terms and conditions as he determines are in the best interests of the State, all of the right, title, and interest of the State of California in and to the right-of-way for a term of 100 years from September 11, 1905, acquired by the State by deed dated June 1, 1943, recorded in Book 61 of Deeds, page 147, Records of Del Norte County, California, and described in a conveyance by Frank Hussey to the Del Norte Company, a corporation, by deed dated September 11, 1905, recorded in Book B of Agreements, page 156, Records of Del Norte County, California, to be “* * * a right of way 30 feet in
 width on the lands of said Hussey bordering the edge of the timber sold by said Hussey to said Del Norte Company * * * solely for the purpose of removing the logs and other timber from the tract of land belonging to the said Del Norte Company and such other lands adjoining as it may hereafter acquire and for the purpose of doing such other things as may be necessary or convenient in the removing of said timber of various sorts and shapes.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 421.)
-------------------------------------------

5015.

(a) In recognition of the late Robert H. Meyer’s many contributions to the growth and improvement of the state park system, the El Matador, El Pescador, and La Piedra State Beaches are hereby designated and shall be known collectively as the Robert H. Meyer Memorial State Beaches.

(b) Not later than January 15, 1984, the department shall erect appropriate signs at, and in the vicinity of, the state beaches to reflect the designation made by this section. Thereafter, the department shall cause all directories and other publications concerning the state park system to
 reflect that designation as the publications are periodically revised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 449, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5015.5.

The Baldwin Hills State Recreation Area is hereby designated and shall be known as the Kenneth Hahn State Recreation Area.

The department shall erect appropriate signs to reflect the designation made by this section and shall cause all directories and other publications concerning the state park system to reflect the designation as the publications are periodically revised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1360, Sec. 128.)
-------------------------------------------

5015.6.

In recognition of the late Ed Z’berg’s many contributions to the growth and improvement of the state park system, Sugar Pine Point State Park is hereby designated and shall be known as the Ed Z’berg Sugar Pine Point State Park.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 240, Sec. 22.   Effective August 13, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5015.8.

(a) The department shall provide assistance acquiring and accepting land immediately adjacent to, and that expands, Chino Hills State Park, by transferring three properties into the state park system. The properties are known as First National Investment Properties, which consists of nine parcels, Eastbridge, which consists of four parcels, and Beattie, which is one parcel. The department shall agree to accept and manage each of these properties as a part of the Chino Hills State Park. All acquisitions shall come from willing landowners.

(b) The department shall manage the properties and parcels acquired pursuant to subdivision (a) with funds held for that purpose or
 obtained through the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California settlement agreement. Only 131 acres, which shall consist of the Beattie property and the northern most 120-acre parcel of the First National Investment Properties, shall be managed as mitigation lands compliant with that settlement agreement. The remaining parcels of the First National Investment Properties and the Eastbridge parcels shall be managed simply as additional parklands.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 760, Sec. 1.   (SB 266)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5016.

In order to eliminate or acquire privately owned lands situated within the exterior boundaries of the Anza-Borrego Desert State Park, the department is authorized to exchange for such lands other lands of approximately equal value which have been or may hereafter be patented to the state for park purposes by the federal government. In making the exchanges the department may comply with all rules prescribed by the Secretary of the Interior relating thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1431.)
-------------------------------------------

5016.1.

In order to exchange certain lands patented to the State of California for park purposes situated outside and within 10 miles of the exterior boundaries of the Anza-Borrego Desert State Park for the purpose of acquisition of other public domain lands needed for park purposes still within these boundaries as well as elsewhere in the state, the department is authorized to exchange such lands for lands of approximate equal value which may be made available for park purposes by the federal government. In making the exchanges the department may comply with all rules prescribed by the Secretary of Interior relating thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1431.)
-------------------------------------------

5016.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Parks and Recreation may enter into an agreement for the acquisition of the “Freeman Property,” as identified in subdivision (d). The acquisition of the “Freeman Property” pursuant to this authorization and identified in this map is exempt from the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA) (Division 13 (commencing with Section
 21000)).

(b) The exemption under subdivision (a) does not apply to any general plan that is required for the management of the “Freeman Property,” or any portion thereof, pursuant to Section 5002.2, or to any subsequent project approved for the “Freeman Property,” or any portion thereof.

(c) The acquisition of the “Freeman Property” by the department is subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The boundary between the Anza-Borrego Desert State Park and the Ocotillo Wells State Vehicular Recreation Area shall be in substantial conformance to the dividing line among Sections 8, 9, 10, 11, 19, and 20, of Township 10 South, Range 09 East, S.B.B.M., as identified on the map.

(2) Sections 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 17, 18, 19, and 20, of Township
 10 South, Range 09 East, S.B.B.M., as identified on the map above the dividing line, shall be annexed to the Anza-Borrego Desert State Park upon completion of transfer of title to the department.

(3) Sections 9, 10, 11, 14, 15, 16, 19, 20, 21, 22, 23, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, 34, and 35, of Township 10 South, Range 09 East, S.B.B.M., as identified on the map below the dividing line, shall be annexed to the Ocotillo Wells State Vehicular Recreation Area upon completion of transfer of title to the department.

(d) The following map describes the “Freeman Property.”

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

 NOTICE OF INCOMPLETE TEXT: The Freeman Property map 
 
 appears in the hard-copy publication of the chaptered bill. 
 
 See Sec. 11, Chapter 718 (p. 27), Statutes of 2010. 

* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * *

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 718, Sec. 11.   (SB 855)   Effective October 19, 2010.   Note: See published chaptered bill for complete section text. The Freeman Property map appears on page 27 of Ch. 718.)
-------------------------------------------

5018.

Whenever, after the receipt of a report submitted pursuant to Section 5017 with respect to a state beach or park or recreational area, the Legislature appropriates money for the acquisition, development, or construction of such state beach or park or recreational area, the department shall forthwith commence with such acquisition, development, or construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2164.)
-------------------------------------------

5018.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may delegate to the department the right to exercise the same authority granted to the Division of the State Architect and the Real Estate Services Division in the Department of General Services, to plan, design, construct, and administer contracts and professional services for legislatively approved capital outlay projects.

(b) Any right afforded to the department pursuant to subdivision (a) to exercise project planning, design, construction, and administration of contracts and professional services may be revoked, in whole or in part, by the Department of Finance at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 742, Sec. 4.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.

When property is deeded to the State for park or beach purposes, oil and mineral rights in such property may be reserved in such deeds by the grantor; provided, that any prospecting or extracting of oil and minerals shall in no manner disturb the surface of such property or any improvements placed in or upon the property in pursuit of its use for recreation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 441.)
-------------------------------------------

5019.5.
